Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-743
Commitment to await requisition; bail.

If from the examination before the judge or magistrate it appears that the person held is the person charged with having committed the crime alleged and, except in cases arising under section 29-734, that he has fled from justice, the judge or magistrate must, by a warrant reciting the accusation, commit him to the county jail for such a time not exceeding thirty days and specified in the warrant, as will enable the arrest of the accused to be made under a warrant of the Governor on a requisition of the Executive Authority of the state having jurisdiction of the offense, unless the accused give bail as provided in section 29-744, or until he shall be legally discharged.

Laws 1963, c. 159, § 15, p. 563.

The illegality of a prisoner's custody prior to the issuance of a rendition warrant from a sister state does not render the warrant void and unenforceable. Bell v. Janing, 188 Neb. 690, 199 N.W.2d 24 (1972).